Utah statutes.
61-2-201.   Division of Real Estate created -- Director appointed -- Personnel.

(1)  There is created within the department a Division of Real Estate.  The division is responsible for the administration and enforcement of:

(a)  this chapter;

(b)  Title 57, Chapter 11, Utah Uniform Land Sales Practices Act;

(c)  Title 57, Chapter 19, Timeshare and Camp Resort Act;

(d)  Title 57, Chapter 23, Real Estate Cooperative Marketing Act;

(e)  Chapter 2c, Utah Residential Mortgage Practices and Licensing Act;

(f)  Chapter 2e, Appraisal Management Company Registration and Regulation Act;

(g)  Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act; and

(h)  Chapter 2g, Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Act.

(2)  The division is under the direction and control of a director appointed by the executive director of the department with the approval of the governor.  The director holds the office of director at the pleasure of the governor.

(3)  The director, with the approval of the executive director, may employ personnel necessary to discharge the duties of the division at salaries to be fixed by the director according to standards established by the Department of Administrative Services.

